http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7745932.html Photobucket to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies AM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - A Web site that enables its users to store photos and video for inclusion in MySpace profiles will become a part of the popular online hangout. MySpace's parent, News Corp.'s Fox Interactive Media, agreed to acquire Photobucket Inc. just weeks after a public spat in which MySpace partially blocked content from Photobucket. The block was mysteriously lifted after about two weeks, but both sides had been silent on the details of their peacemaking. Fox also agreed separately to buy Flektor Inc., which offers Web-based tools for creating slideshows, video mash-ups and other interactive presentations. Financial terms of the two deals were not disclosed. MySpace users often embed third-party photos, video and other material in their personal profile pages, and sites like Photobucket and Google Inc.'s YouTube make that easy by providing the programming code to cut and paste into MySpace pages. The practice has made Photobucket one of the leading sites on the Internet, even though relatively few access content directly through its home page. The Photobucket block, which occurred in April, followed MySpace's complaints that the hosting service had been encouraging users to incorporate an ad-supported slideshow into their MySpace profiles. MySpace said the sideshow violated its policies banning unauthorized commercial activities. Photobucket's chief executive, Alex Welch, responded by accusing MySpace of limiting free expression and treating users as a commodity. He was more conciliatory two weeks later, saying the two had "established open lines of communication and procedures," but he made no mention of any negotiations over a sale of his company. Fox's agreements to purchase Photobucket and Flektor represent the latest acquisitions of startups by a larger Internet company. In November, Google bought video-sharing site YouTube for $1.76 billion.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764687.html Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference AM PDT CARLSBAD, Calif. (AP) - Legendary technology rivals Bill Gates and Steve Jobs made a rare joint appearance Wednesday and wasted no time making nice. "Bill built the first software company in the industry," said Jobs, co-founder of Apple Inc. "Bill focused on software before anyone." Gates, the Microsoft Corp. co-founder, hailed Jobs for taking big risks and developing products with "incredible taste and elegance." "What Steve has done is quite phenomenal," Gates said. That set the tone for a 90-minute chat in which the two computer industry icons fielded questions from Wall Street Journal columnist Walt Mossberg and technology reporter Kara Swisher at the newspaper's "D: All Things Digital" conference. Jobs and Gates reminisced about early days working together in the 1970s, interspersing their views on the current state of technology. When Swisher asked for the greatest misunderstanding about their relationship, Jobs joked: "We've kept our marriage secret for over a decade now." Gates added: "Neither of us have anything to complain about, in general. It's been fun to work together." The two briefly discussed the 2008 elections. Gates said candidates should be measured on their ideas for improving education. Gates and his wife, Melinda, created the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation in 2000, which is now the world's largest philanthropic foundation. The foundation gives a majority of its grants in the areas of world health, global development and education. Although the two companies worked together in the 1970s - Microsoft even invested in a struggling Apple in 1997 - they have remained fierce rivals. Gates dropped out of Harvard University in 1975 to found Microsoft with childhood friend Paul Allen and turned the company into the world's largest maker of computer software. Jobs and friend Steve Wozniak founded Apple in 1976, five years before IBM Corp. jumped into the personal computer market. Jobs left Apple in 1985 following a struggle with the company's board but made a triumphant return in 1997 when Apple was struggling to survive. Jobs is widely credited for Apple's renaissance with a string of innovative products - the iMac computer for consumers, the powerful PowerMac and PowerBook, and more recently, the iPod digital music player. Microsoft has long dominated with its Windows operating system and software programs like Word and Excel, but Apple scored big with its iPod, introduced in 2001, and its iTunes online music store. Next month, Apple introduces its much-anticipated iPhone mobile handset. Microsoft released the Zune music player in November to compete with iPod. An audience member later asked the two men what they learned from each other. "The way he does things is just different. It's magical," Gates said. Jobs said he admired Microsoft's ability to collaborate with other technology companies. "They learned how to partner with people really well, and I think if Apple could have had a little more of that in its DNA, it would have served it extremely well," he said.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7746007.html Animal CSIs taking a bite out of crime CSIs taking a bite out of crime Forensic Scientist Ngyuen Truong inspects a tray of samples for DNA testing before placing it in separator at the Veterinary Genetics Laboratory at the University of California Davis. AM PDT RICHMOND, Va. (AP) - When Marylin Christian's beloved cat Cody was found dead under suspicious circumstances two years ago, she vowed to seek justice. But when Christian suggested that animal control officers collect saliva from a neighbor's dog, Lucky, to see if it could be genetically linked to hair found in Cody's mouth and claws, she was met with bewilderment. "They kind of acted like, 'Well, you've been watching a little too much 'CSI,"' Christian recalled with a laugh. Christian eventually paid $500 for the evidence to be tested at the Veterinary Genetics Lab at the University of California at Davis, which has the largest database of domesticated-animal DNA in the country. The result? A one in 67 million chance the hair belonged to any animal other than Lucky. "Usually, people come to us because it's a very emotional matter," said Beth Wictum, acting director of the lab's forensics division. "They've lost a pet, and for many people, pets are a member of the family and they want to get resolution." In the time that's passed since Christian's loss, more and more law enforcement officials have come to share her interest in applying forensic methods to cases involving animals - whether the animal is a victim, perpetrator, or even a witness. "There's some real serious cases where animal DNA played a role in helping solve the case," said Denver District Attorney Mitch Morrissey, a DNA expert who has asked investigators to collect DNA samples from murder suspects' pets at crime scenes. "I believe that it will be used more and more." Wictum's lab handles between 150 and 200 cases a year from all over the world. But scientists don't just deal with pet-on-pet attacks. They process evidence from cases involving animal attacks on humans, human attacks on animals, and even human crimes against each other in which an animal may yield important clues. In one case, the lab used DNA testing to match dog excrement found on the bottom of a murder suspect's shoe to excrement found near the crime scene - a piece of evidence that helped secure the man's conviction. In another case, a sexual assault victim couldn't pick her attacker out of a lineup - but she remembered her dog had urinated on the man's pickup truck. The dog's DNA matched DNA traces found on the truck's tire and the suspect pleaded guilty. ASPCA forensic veterinarian Melinda Merck relies on the same techniques as standard crime scene investigators - ballistics, toxicology, blood spatter analysis - to help solve animal cruelty cases across the country. "It's rapidly growing," she said of her specialty. "There is a tremendous interest from the veterinarians and there's a tremendous interest from law enforcement." Last year, Merck testified in the Atlanta trial of two teenage brothers who tortured a puppy and left it in an oven to die. Merck was able to prove the puppy was alive when it was tortured and reconstructed the animal's grim final moments for a jury. The brothers were sentenced to a maximum punishment of 10 years in prison. Even forensic entomologists - who use insects such as maggots to help estimate a victim's time of death - have crossed over into the world of animal-related crimes. Forensic entomologist Jason Byrd often is called on to help investigators with wildlife crimes and poaching cases. If a bald eagle is shot at a game reserve, Byrd can examine the maggots on the bird's carcass to help determine its time of death. Investigators then can access the records at the reserve to narrow down who was in the area at the time of the shooting. "They're not scared to spend money now to figure out who's been poaching animals," Byrd said. "Now they do true investigation techniques - they throw forensic science at the problem." As the field of animal forensics grows, so does the need for training. Colleges are just beginning to take note. This year, Purdue University's School of Veterinary Medicine began offering a forensic veterinary medicine course, believed to be the first of its kind in the country, said professor Janice Sojka. Sojka said she recognized a need for the course after noticing a recent explosion of interest in the field. "With 'CSI' and 'Law & Order,' people kind of know what's out there and what can be done and then there's a growing expectation that you'll do that for your animals," she said. "It's become a lot more respected." Despite the fact that Christian got DNA results, animal control officers refused to declare Lucky a dangerous dog. Lucky and his owners have since moved away. And even though her CSI-style pursuit of justice was expensive and frustrating, the stay-at-home mother of two has no regrets. "I felt like I needed to do it for my family," she said. "The two-legged and the four-legged."
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7745957.html Spring blockbusters jump from theater to game console blockbusters jump from theater to game console AM PDT Why do video-game publishers bother with movie tie-ins? The cost of licensing an anticipated blockbuster (like, say, this summer's "Transformers") is expensive. Designers have to work within creative constraints imposed by the Hollywood studio, and then have to rush to crank out something playable by the time the movie's released. And usually no one - neither gamers nor moviegoers - is satisfied with the results. And yet, the combination of an appealing license and decent gameplay can lead to a blockbuster game. THQ sold more than 2.6 million copies of its engaging "Cars" title, making it the second best-selling game of the year (after "Madden NFL 07"). On the other hand, you have disasters like Electronic Arts' "Superman Returns," which was delayed nearly five months after the movie's release and flatlined at retail. The three franchises spun off here have all been made into games before. Earlier "Spider-Man" games have done well, but critics have been unimpressed by previous "Pirates" and "Shrek" efforts. Let's see where they stand in 2007. -"Pirates of the Caribbean: At World's End" (Disney, for the Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, $59.99; Wii, $49.99; PlayStation 2, $39.99): The latest "Pirates" game is kind of a mash-up of the last two films in the trilogy, following Capt. Jack Sparrow's quest to retrieve Davy Jones' heart. Actually, it's difficult to make out that plot if you haven't seen the films; then again, many "Pirates" viewers have left theaters confused. Most of the game consists of swordplay against redcoats, monsters or other pirates, but there's not much skill involved and the fights get monotonous. There are a few decent boss battles that are a bit more challenging, as well as some simple platform sequences and a diverting game of liar's dice. Jack is usually front and center, but sometimes you get to play as Elizabeth Swann or Will Turner. Alas, none of the film's stars showed up for voiceover work, but their digital likenesses are pretty good, especially on the Xbox 360. Two stars out of four. -"Shrek the Third" (Activision, for the Xbox 360, Wii, $49.99; PlayStation 2, $39.99): You won't hear the voices of Mike Myers or Eddie Murphy here, either, but the video-game versions of Shrek and Donkey are otherwise indistinguishable from their computer-generated big-screen counterparts. Perhaps the most interesting thing about this game is the way it tells the story of "Shrek the Third" through oddly amusing two-dimensional puppet shows. The actual gameplay is woefully slapdash, consisting mostly of Shrek running around and beating up various fairy-tale villains. At times you'll switch to a supporting character, like Fiona or Puss in Boots, but the action still involves plowing through waves of enemies. Occasional sequences where you need to jump around obstacles are marred by sloppy controls and bad camera angles. "Shrek the Third" also offers a handful of lackluster minigames, like frog-herding and shuffleboard. (Really.) Overall, it seems like a wasted opportunity - although its flaws probably won't stop it from becoming a best-seller. One-and-a-half stars. -"Spider-Man 3" (Activision, for the Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, $59.99; Wii, $49.99; PlayStation 2, $39.99): "Spider-Man 3" looks likely to be the box-office winner among this year's "part 3s," and it squeaks out a victory in the game department, too. Then again, developer Treyarch has created three previous Spidey games, so it's disappointing that this game isn't better. It's still a rush to swing around Manhattan's skyscrapers, and it's nice to have the freedom to choose which missions you want to take on. But there's almost too much going on; you'll spend way too much time fighting gangs that have nothing to do with the movie's story. Unfortunately, the fights are tedious - until you take on a boss like New Goblin or Kingpin, when the fights become long and tedious. While we're glad to have voiceovers from Tobey Maguire and Bruce Campbell, the graphics on the 360 and PS3 aren't as slick as we'd expected. And the PS2 and Wii versions (not developed by Treyarch) are even uglier. Two-and-a-half stars.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech aims to help spies with new technology The Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity will try to develop groundbreaking technology for the 16 spy agencies. Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference Legendary technology rivals Bill Gates and Steve Jobs made a rare joint appearance Wednesday and wasted no time making nice. Cosmonauts install protective panels on international space station Two Russian cosmonauts climbed out of the international space station Wednesday to install protective panels designed to shield the orbiting outpost from dangerous space debris. Developer halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages Apple debuts songs online free of copy restrictions Animal CSIs taking a bite out of crime blockbusters jump from theater to game console Photobucket to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies Google chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal Mock assembly lines work out glitches Nintendo Wii: All fun and games, until someone gets hurt Wondering what that song is? Just ask your phone Infrared burners offer more options for backyard cooks Plant a tree, jet to Cancun? Offset schemes not that simple College programming classes retooled with chirping, cookie boxes Sony develops film-thin display that bends in full color Researchers use Web registration tool to digitize books Microsoft unveils new 'Surface' computer, the coffee European Union probes Google over search privacy concerns Facebook opens site to other companies Gasoline price Web sites see huge increase in visitors Site puts 90 million U.S. War records online Free upgrade for PlayStation 3 enhances image quality of old games MySpace hands over info on sex offenders New service allows you to start your own cell company New Google feature shows daily list of hot topics House approves bill to combat criminal use of spyware
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764732.html Agency aims to help spies with new technology aims to help spies with new technology This photo shows a Micro Unmanned Aerial Vehicle Dragonfly, developed by CIA in the 1970s, this micro UAV was the first flight of an insect-sized vehicle. AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - Using a new laptop and a satellite link, FBI agents can find out within two minutes whether the fingerprint from a newly captured suspect overseas matches a terrorist database in Virginia. Intelligence officials are running documents in languages such as Arabic through a new computer program called "English Now." It converts the foreign characters into the Roman alphabet and makes words such as Baghdad, President Bush or Osama bin Laden jump out to spies who can't read Arabic. The language software and the fingerprint-recognition system are examples of new spy gear that the national intelligence director's office bought last year. They may seem like tools that should have been available years ago, but the government isn't noted for its ability to quickly develop new technology. A fledging center called IARPA is hoping to change that. The Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity will try to develop groundbreaking technology for the 16 spy agencies. One potential tool sounds like it comes from an episode of Star Trek: "cloaking" technology that can bend radar around an object to make it appear it's not there. Others include power sources shrunk using nanotechnology and quantum computers that can speed code-breaking, says IARPA acting director Steve Nixon. "The world has changed in dramatic ways with globalization of technology," Nixon said in an interview. "These are the things that might not get done otherwise." But not everyone is convinced this is the right way to make new spy tools. The House Intelligence Committee has questions about whether the government truly needs it. "Much of this research is already going on," said Rep. Heather Wilson, R-N.M., the top Republican on the House Intelligence Committee's panel on technical intelligence. She said IARPA raises questions about the role of new National Intelligence Director Mike McConnell, who was supposed to coordinate U.S. intelligence agencies - not get into their daily operations. "Is it to fund these things and pull them into the DNI's office and give itself its own turf and projects and pet rocks?" she asked. There is even resistance within the CIA itself, according to officials who spoke about the concerns privately. The agency gets money that is supposed to go for spy tools that can be shared across the government. CIA spokesman Paul Gimigliano denied any friction, saying the agency welcomes ideas that promote collaboration on new technology. In the last half-century, U.S. spy agencies have made technical breakthroughs large and small. In the 1970s, the CIA shared its lithium-iodine batteries with the medical field, which now uses them in pacemakers. Its scientists developed microdot cameras that can produce images so small that they can be hidden in the period of this sentence. They also built a life-size robotic dragonfly that could have been used for surveillance, if only it could have handled crosswinds. If IARPA can clear some crucial hurdles, including convincing its congressional skeptics, the new office will be modeled after a similar agency that develops gee-whiz toys for the Pentagon. The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency was created after the Russians launched Sputnik in 1957, driving home the U.S. competitive disadvantage in space. Since then, DARPA researchers have brought the United States much-heralded advances including stealth technology, global positioning systems and the Internet. But it also brought controversy. The agency's Total Information Awareness data-mining program was launched after the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks to use technology to find terrorists; critics saw it as a step toward Big Brother-style mass government surveillance. Congress eliminated the program's funding at DARPA in 2003, but portions were moved to secret accounts at other agencies. The new intelligence organization will be significantly smaller than DARPA, which has a $3 billion annual budget. It will be based at the University of Maryland and staffed with 56 intelligence professionals from the CIA and from McConnell's organization. Rather than funding IARPA in the House intelligence budget bill passed this month, lawmakers directed technology dollars to centers developing tools that can be shared across government, including offices within the CIA, National Security Agency and National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency. The measure included criticism of McConnell's office for failing to provide details on how IARPA will work and raised questions about whether it would harm existing research for spy tools. Nixon says IARPA won't have labs and electron microscopes, but will sponsor research at universities, national labs and other organizations. IARPA is thinking broadly, he said. It won't limit itself to hard sciences, but will also tackle social-science problems such as finding tools for language research or to help analysts measure cultural habits of another society. He also said the organization will work on privacy protection. NSA and other agencies want to be able to make better use of foreign intelligence information from overseas, which often contains information on U.S. citizens. Given the lack of oversight in intelligence agencies, "this is an area where the research community has to step gingerly," said Marc Rotenberg, executive director of the Washington-based Electronic Privacy Information Center.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764597.html Developer halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages AM PDT BEIJING (AP) - A Chinese city has halted construction of a chemical plant after residents sent more than 1 million mobile phone text messages protesting possible pollution dangers, news reports said Thursday. The $1.4 billion facility being built by Tenglong Aromatic PX (Xiamen) Co. Ltd to produce the petrochemical paraxylene was planned for the booming southeastern port of Xiamen, the Xinhua News Agency and newspapers said. "The Xiamen city government has decided to suspend construction of the PX (paraxylene) plant in Haicang District," a deputy mayor, Ding Guoyan, was quoted as saying by Xinhua. "The city government has listened to the opinions expressed and has decided, after careful deliberation, that the project must be re-evaluated." Paraxylene is used in production of plastics, polyester and film. Short-term exposure to paraxylene can cause eye, nose or throat irritation in humans, according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Chronic exposure can affect the central nervous system and may cause death. The plant was due to be located 10 miles from the center of Xiamen, a center for Taiwanese and Hong Kong investment. The nearest homes were one mile away, according to news reports. Demand for chemicals such as paraxylene is soaring as China's export-driven manufacturing industries expand. The communist government, long indifferent to the environmental cost of China's economic boom, has become more sensitive to pollution complaints after accidents that polluted rivers, disrupting water supplies to major cities. Farmers in areas throughout the country have protested over pollution that has tainted water supplies and ruined farmland. Xiamen residents sent more than 1 million text messages protesting plans to build the plant, Xinhua said. The suspension of the Xiamen project coincides with government efforts to slow an investment boom in industries where supplies of factories and other assets exceed demand. Last week, a state news agency quoted officials who cited public concerns about radiation exposure in announcing the suspension of work on a futuristic magnetic-levitation train line in Shanghai that critics said was too expensive and impractical. Irving, Texas-based ExxonMobil Corp.; Saudi Aramco, the Saudi government oil company; and China's No. 2 oil company, China Petroleum & Chemical Co., better known as Sinopec, announced in March they were expanding a joint venture chemical plant in the southeastern city of Quanzhou to produce paraxylene and other chemicals.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764662.html Cosmonauts install protective panels on international space station install protective panels on international space station AM PDT CAPE CANAVERAL, Fla. (AP) - Two Russian cosmonauts climbed out of the international space station Wednesday to install protective panels designed to shield the orbiting outpost from dangerous space debris. Commander Fyodor Yurchikhin and flight engineer Oleg Kotov opened a hatch on the Russian side of the space station at 3:05 p.m. EDT. The spacewalk ended about 5½ hours later. "Hooray! We're back home!" one of the cosmonauts said after climbing back into the space station airlock. The only lament from the first-time spacewalkers came at the end, from a cosmonaut who complained about an ill-fitted glove on his spacesuit. Both men were tethered during the spacewalk to keep them from floating away. The station's third occupant, U.S. astronaut Sunita Williams, remained inside. Space debris includes objects such as discarded rocket parts, planetary dust and rocks. Scientists consider it the greatest threat to the space station, orbiting about 220 miles above Earth. Kotov rode at the end of a crane operated by Yurchikhin to reach the stack of aluminum panels about 60 feet from the hatch. The 17 protective panels, each about 2 feet by 3 feet and weighing about 20 pounds, were delivered to the station last December and left outside in a formation dubbed "the Christmas tree." The cosmonauts installed five of the panels on a Russian section of the space station, and the others were to be put in place during a spacewalk next week. Engineers on the ground are able to monitor by radar the largest pieces of space debris - objects larger than a softball - and adjust the station's position accordingly, so the shielding will protect against smaller objects. "The consequence of small particles is not so great," said Kirk Shireman, NASA's deputy program manager for the space station. "Then there are the midrange particles. Those are the ones we worry about." An independent safety task force in February said that there was a 9 percent risk that the space station, once completed in 2010, could be hit with space debris severe enough to cause the loss of the outpost or crew members. That risk estimate was reduced to 5 percent if protective panels were installed on Russian portions of the space station. Sections of the space station built by NASA and the Japanese and European space agencies were protected sufficiently against space debris, the task force said. The spacewalk started about 45 minutes late, but a bright moon allowed the cosmonauts to catch up by working through what normally would have been darkness after orbital sunsets. The space station circles the Earth every 90 minutes. Asked by Mission Control in Moscow how it felt in their spacesuits once they were outside, one of the cosmonauts joked: "Kind of cloudy, a bit rainy. We didn't take an umbrella with us." The cosmonauts also successfully rerouted a cable for a navigation antenna that will be used later in the year for the first flight of a new European cargo vehicle. Wednesday's spacewalk was the first of two scheduled a week apart. Yurchikhin and Kotov will perform another one next Wednesday with similar tasks, including depositing canisters containing biological experiments outside the station. Space shuttle Atlantis and its seven astronauts are scheduled to fly to the station early next month. NASA managers on Wednesday began a two-day meeting at the Kennedy Space Center to decide whether to go ahead with the planned June 8 launch. A final decision was expected Thursday for the launch, which previously was postponed from mid-March because of a hailstorm that damaged the insulating foam on the shuttle's external tank.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7745882.html Google chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal AM PDT SEOUL, South Korea (AP) - Google Chairman Eric Schmidt said Wednesday that U.S. regulatory approval of his company's proposed acquisition of DoubleClick will not be hindered by concerns over privacy. "We're quite convinced that the proposed merger meets all of the appropriate U.S. laws and is ultimately very good for consumers and for advertisers and publishers," Schmidt said at a news conference. Google, the world's No. 1 Internet search engine company, announced its plan to buy New York-based DoubleClick Inc. last month in a $3.1 billion acquisition that privacy advocates have urged the Federal Trade Commission to investigate. DoubleClick helps its customers place and track online advertising, including search ads, which Google - more than its nearest search competitors Yahoo Inc. and Microsoft Corp. - has turned into an extremely lucrative business. Google confirmed Tuesday that the FTC is conducting an antitrust review of the deal. Typically, antitrust reviews focus on monopoly concerns. But there is precedent for them to address privacy issues, analysts say. Schmidt said that Google, when considering the acquisition, "looked very carefully" at privacy and other issues that would come under legal review "because we knew competitors would raise those issues, as indeed they have." Mountain View, California-based Google Inc. is "not concerned that the choice of the FTC brings in some new issue that we had not thought about," Schmidt said. Schmidt was in South Korea to participate in the Seoul Digital Forum 2007, a three-day gathering of technology and media industry leaders organized by South Korean TV network SBS. Schmidt predicted Google would clear all regulatory hurdles and complete the acquisition by the end of 2007. He reiterated that view Wednesday, saying, "we're hoping to close later this year." Several consumer advocacy groups, led by the Electronic Privacy Information Center, urged the FTC to investigate the privacy implications of the acquisition. The groups said in their April 20 complaint that the two companies, when combined, would have access to an unprecedented amount of data on consumers' Web usage and Internet search habits. Regarding other possible acquisitions, Schmidt said Google is "always open" to the idea. DoubleClick had been the target of a fierce bidding war between Google and Microsoft. The Redmond, Washington-based Microsoft earlier this month agreed to buy U.S.-based online advertising firm aQuantive Inc. and has reportedly been in discussions with Yahoo for a possible merger or takeover. Schmidt carefully steered clear of any comment on Microsoft when asked about the company's activities. "We are not very focused on our competitors and so I won't speculate on Microsoft's current or future M&A activities," he said. "We've found it better to stay focused on our mission, our advertisers, our partners and our global presence as we're doing today."
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7751087.html Apple debuts songs online free of copy restrictions debuts songs online free of copy restrictions PM PDT PM PDT SAN JOSE, Calif. (AP) - Apple Inc.'s iTunes Store started selling thousands of songs without copy protection Wednesday, marking the trendsetting company's latest coup and a model for what analysts say will likely become a pattern for online music sales. Launching initially with songs from music company EMI Group PLC, iTunes Plus features tracks that are free of digital rights management, or DRM, technology - copy-protection software that limits where songs or movies can be played and distributed. The unrestricted content means some songs purchased from iTunes will work for the first time directly on portable players other than Apple's iPod, including Microsoft Corp.'s Zune. The inaugural batch of iTunes Plus songs includes music from Coldplay, The Rolling Stones, Norah Jones, Frank Sinatra, Pink Floyd and more than a dozen of Paul McCartney's classic albums. The DRM-free tracks feature a higher sound quality and cost $1.29 apiece - 30 cents more than the usual 99-cent price of other, copy-protected songs at the market-leading online music store. If available, users can upgrade existing purchases to DRM-free versions for 30 cents a song or $3 for most albums, Apple said. London-based EMI, the world's third-largest music company by sales, and Cupertino-based Apple announced their partnership in April to deliver the industry's first major offering of DRM-free songs, sharing a vision of what both companies say their consumers want: flexibility and CD-audio quality. Other smaller online music vendors, such as eMusic.com, already offer songs without DRM, but the selections have been limited to mostly content from independent labels. Barney Wragg, the global head of digital music at EMI, said the iTunes Plus launch capped six months of work to convert most all of the company's digital catalog into a DRM-free format. "Our customers told us two things deterred them from buying digital," Wragg said. "They weren't 100 percent confident that the songs they'd purchase could play on their devices, and they wanted something closer to CD quality." Earlier this year, Apple CEO Steve Jobs called on the world's four major record companies to start selling songs online without copy-protection software. "We definitely think it's the right thing to do," Eddy Cue, Apple's vice president of iTunes, said Wednesday. "In this case, EMI's a leader and we think others will follow." In a statement Wednesday, Jobs reiterated that Apple expects that more than half of the 5 million songs on iTunes will feature a DRM-free version by the end of the year. In the meantime, Apple's iTunes Store will continue to offer songs in the same copy-protected format as today at 99 cents per download and encoded at 128 kilobits per second. The iTunes Plus versions are encoded at 256 kbps, which Apple says makes the audio quality on par with original recordings. Apple also will continue to encode its songs - including EMI's DRM-free content - in the AAC audio format, which could force some users to go through an extra step of converting tunes into a version that would be compatible with their players. Some gadgets don't support AAC, including SanDisk's newest Sansa Connect or Samsung Electronics Co.'s YP-K3, but industry analyst Susan Kevorkian of the IDC market research company expects support for AAC will widen following Apple's move this week. Amazon.com Inc., by comparison, said it plans to sell songs online later this year in the DRM-free MP3 format - the popular unrestricted audio standard that is supported by virtually every device, including Apple's best-selling iPod. The next generation of digital music will be untethered from usage restrictions, Kevorkian predicts. It's something major music labels - other than just EMI - will have to do if they want to combat the industry's years long decline of music CD sales, she said. "They absolutely have to reach the Internet to drive music sales, and part of that is to remove the hurdle that comes with the lack of interoperability," Kevorkian said. Other major music labels - Sony BMG Music Entertainment, Universal Music Group and Warner Music - have all experimented with limited amounts of unprotected content online but have yet to make as aggressive a move as EMI. Representatives of Warner and Sony BMG declined to comment Wednesday about the iTunes Plus offering or their own plans around DRM technology. Universal did not return a call for comment. Michael Gartenberg, an analyst at JupiterResearch, said any worries the music companies have over increased piracy from DRM-free downloads are overblown. "CDs are all sold without copy protection already, so these (unrestricted) digital files are not going to change the piracy story," he said. "People who aren't going to pay for things aren't going to pay for things, and DRM just adds an unnecessary layer of complexity here for people who do embrace this medium and have already bought billions of songs on iTunes." Shares of Apple closed at $118.77, up $4.42, or nearly 4 percent, and gained another 65 cents in extended trading. In a separate announcement after the stock market closed, Apple said it will soon introduce direct access to YouTube videos from its Apple TV set-top-box device. It also announced a beefier, 160-gigabyte Apple TV model that will be available starting Thursday for $399.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7744297.html PM PDT SEATTLE (AP) - Microsoft Corp. has taken the wraps off "Surface," a coffee-table shaped computer that responds to touch and to special bar codes attached to everyday objects. The machines, which Microsoft planned to debut Wednesday at a technology conference in Carlsbad, Calif., are set to arrive in November in T-Mobile USA stores and properties owned by Starwood Hotels & Resorts Worldwide Inc. and Harrah's Entertainment Inc. Surface is essentially a Windows Vista PC tucked inside a shiny black table base, topped with a 30-inch touchscreen in a clear acrylic frame. Five cameras that can sense nearby objects are mounted beneath the screen. Users can interact with the machine by touching or dragging their fingertips and objects such as paintbrushes across the screen, or by setting real-world items tagged with special bar-code labels on top of it. Unlike most touchscreens, Surface can respond to more than one touch at a time. During a demonstration with a reporter last week, Mark Bolger, the Surface Computing group's marketing director, "dipped" his finger in an on-screen paint palette, then dragged it across the screen to draw a smiley face. Then he used all 10 fingers at once to give the face a full head of hair. With a price tag between $5,000 and $10,000 per unit, Microsoft isn't immediately aiming for the finger painting set. (The company said it expects prices to drop enough to make consumer versions feasible in three to five years.) Some of the first Surface models are planned to help customers pick out new cell phones at T-Mobile stores. When customers plop a phone down on the screen, Surface will read its bar code and display information about the handset. Customers can also select calling plans and ringtones by dragging icons toward the phone. Guests sitting in some Starwood Hotel lobbies will be able to cluster around the Surface to play music, then buy songs using a credit card or rewards card tagged with a bar code. In some hotel restaurants, customers will be able to order food and drinks, then split the bill by setting down a card or a room key and dragging their menu items "onto" the card. At Harrah's locations, visitors will be able to learn about nearby Harrah's venues on an interactive map, then book show tickets or make dinner reservations. Microsoft is working on a limited number of programs to ship with Surface, including one for sharing digital photographs. Bolger placed a card with a bar code onto Surface's surface; digital photographs appeared to spill out of the card into piles on the screen. Several people gathered around the table pulled photos across the screen using their fingertips, rotated them in circles and even dragged out the corners to enlarge the images - behavior made possible by the advanced graphics support deep inside Windows Vista. "It's not a touch screen, it's a grab screen," Bolger said. Historically, Microsoft has focused on creating new software, giving computer programmers tools to build applications on its platforms, and left hardware manufacturing to others. (Some recent exceptions include the Xbox 360 and the Zune music player, made by the same Microsoft division that developed Surface.) For now, Microsoft is making the Surface hardware itself, and has only given six outside software development firms the tools they need to make Surface applications. Matt Rosoff, an analyst at the independent research group Directions on Microsoft, said in an interview that keeping the technology's inner workings under wraps will limit what early customers - the businesses Microsoft is targeting first with the machine - will be able to do with it. But overall, analysts who cover the PC industry were wowed by Surface. Surface is "important for Microsoft as a promising new business, as well as demonstrating very concretely to the market that Microsoft still knows how to innovate, and innovate in a big way," said Michael Gartenberg, an analyst at Jupiter Research.
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7745932.html Photobucket to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies AM PDT AM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - A Web site that enables its users to store photos and video for inclusion in MySpace profiles will become a part of the popular online hangout. MySpace's parent, News Corp.'s Fox Interactive Media, agreed to acquire Photobucket Inc. just weeks after a public spat in which MySpace partially blocked content from Photobucket. The block was mysteriously lifted after about two weeks, but both sides had been silent on the details of their peacemaking. Fox also agreed separately to buy Flektor Inc., which offers Web-based tools for creating slideshows, video mash-ups and other interactive presentations. Financial terms of the two deals were not disclosed. MySpace users often embed third-party photos, video and other material in their personal profile pages, and sites like Photobucket and Google Inc.'s YouTube make that easy by providing the programming code to cut and paste into MySpace pages. The practice has made Photobucket one of the leading sites on the Internet, even though relatively few access content directly through its home page. The Photobucket block, which occurred in April, followed MySpace's complaints that the hosting service had been encouraging users to incorporate an ad-supported slideshow into their MySpace profiles. MySpace said the sideshow violated its policies banning unauthorized commercial activities. Photobucket's chief executive, Alex Welch, responded by accusing MySpace of limiting free expression and treating users as a commodity. He was more conciliatory two weeks later, saying the two had "established open lines of communication and procedures," but he made no mention of any negotiations over a sale of his company. Fox's agreements to purchase Photobucket and Flektor represent the latest acquisitions of startups by a larger Internet company. In November, Google bought video-sharing site YouTube for $1.76 billion. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764687.html Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference May 31, 2007 at 7:55 AM PDT May 31, 2007 at 7:55 AM PDT CARLSBAD, Calif. (AP) - Legendary technology rivals Bill Gates and Steve Jobs made a rare joint appearance Wednesday and wasted no time making nice. "Bill built the first software company in the industry," said Jobs, co-founder of Apple Inc. "Bill focused on software before anyone." Gates, the Microsoft Corp. co-founder, hailed Jobs for taking big risks and developing products with "incredible taste and elegance." "What Steve has done is quite phenomenal," Gates said. That set the tone for a 90-minute chat in which the two computer industry icons fielded questions from Wall Street Journal columnist Walt Mossberg and technology reporter Kara Swisher at the newspaper's "D: All Things Digital" conference. Jobs and Gates reminisced about early days working together in the 1970s, interspersing their views on the current state of technology. When Swisher asked for the greatest misunderstanding about their relationship, Jobs joked: "We've kept our marriage secret for over a decade now." Gates added: "Neither of us have anything to complain about, in general. It's been fun to work together." The two briefly discussed the 2008 elections. Gates said candidates should be measured on their ideas for improving education. Gates and his wife, Melinda, created the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation in 2000, which is now the world's largest philanthropic foundation. The foundation gives a majority of its grants in the areas of world health, global development and education. Although the two companies worked together in the 1970s - Microsoft even invested in a struggling Apple in 1997 - they have remained fierce rivals. Gates dropped out of Harvard University in 1975 to found Microsoft with childhood friend Paul Allen and turned the company into the world's largest maker of computer software. Jobs and friend Steve Wozniak founded Apple in 1976, five years before IBM Corp. jumped into the personal computer market. Jobs left Apple in 1985 following a struggle with the company's board but made a triumphant return in 1997 when Apple was struggling to survive. Jobs is widely credited for Apple's renaissance with a string of innovative products - the iMac computer for consumers, the powerful PowerMac and PowerBook, and more recently, the iPod digital music player. Microsoft has long dominated with its Windows operating system and software programs like Word and Excel, but Apple scored big with its iPod, introduced in 2001, and its iTunes online music store. Next month, Apple introduces its much-anticipated iPhone mobile handset. Microsoft released the Zune music player in November to compete with iPod. An audience member later asked the two men what they learned from each other. "The way he does things is just different. It's magical," Gates said. Jobs said he admired Microsoft's ability to collaborate with other technology companies. "They learned how to partner with people really well, and I think if Apple could have had a little more of that in its DNA, it would have served it extremely well," he said. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7746007.html Animal CSIs taking a bite out of crime CSIs taking a bite out of crime Forensic Scientist Ngyuen Truong inspects a tray of samples for DNA testing before placing it in separator at the Veterinary Genetics Laboratory at the University of California Davis. AM PDT AM PDT RICHMOND, Va. (AP) - When Marylin Christian's beloved cat Cody was found dead under suspicious circumstances two years ago, she vowed to seek justice. But when Christian suggested that animal control officers collect saliva from a neighbor's dog, Lucky, to see if it could be genetically linked to hair found in Cody's mouth and claws, she was met with bewilderment. "They kind of acted like, 'Well, you've been watching a little too much 'CSI,"' Christian recalled with a laugh. Christian eventually paid $500 for the evidence to be tested at the Veterinary Genetics Lab at the University of California at Davis, which has the largest database of domesticated-animal DNA in the country. The result? A one in 67 million chance the hair belonged to any animal other than Lucky. "Usually, people come to us because it's a very emotional matter," said Beth Wictum, acting director of the lab's forensics division. "They've lost a pet, and for many people, pets are a member of the family and they want to get resolution." In the time that's passed since Christian's loss, more and more law enforcement officials have come to share her interest in applying forensic methods to cases involving animals - whether the animal is a victim, perpetrator, or even a witness. "There's some real serious cases where animal DNA played a role in helping solve the case," said Denver District Attorney Mitch Morrissey, a DNA expert who has asked investigators to collect DNA samples from murder suspects' pets at crime scenes. "I believe that it will be used more and more." Wictum's lab handles between 150 and 200 cases a year from all over the world. But scientists don't just deal with pet-on-pet attacks. They process evidence from cases involving animal attacks on humans, human attacks on animals, and even human crimes against each other in which an animal may yield important clues. In one case, the lab used DNA testing to match dog excrement found on the bottom of a murder suspect's shoe to excrement found near the crime scene - a piece of evidence that helped secure the man's conviction. In another case, a sexual assault victim couldn't pick her attacker out of a lineup - but she remembered her dog had urinated on the man's pickup truck. The dog's DNA matched DNA traces found on the truck's tire and the suspect pleaded guilty. ASPCA forensic veterinarian Melinda Merck relies on the same techniques as standard crime scene investigators - ballistics, toxicology, blood spatter analysis - to help solve animal cruelty cases across the country. "It's rapidly growing," she said of her specialty. "There is a tremendous interest from the veterinarians and there's a tremendous interest from law enforcement." Last year, Merck testified in the Atlanta trial of two teenage brothers who tortured a puppy and left it in an oven to die. Merck was able to prove the puppy was alive when it was tortured and reconstructed the animal's grim final moments for a jury. The brothers were sentenced to a maximum punishment of 10 years in prison. Even forensic entomologists - who use insects such as maggots to help estimate a victim's time of death - have crossed over into the world of animal-related crimes. Forensic entomologist Jason Byrd often is called on to help investigators with wildlife crimes and poaching cases. If a bald eagle is shot at a game reserve, Byrd can examine the maggots on the bird's carcass to help determine its time of death. Investigators then can access the records at the reserve to narrow down who was in the area at the time of the shooting. "They're not scared to spend money now to figure out who's been poaching animals," Byrd said. "Now they do true investigation techniques - they throw forensic science at the problem." As the field of animal forensics grows, so does the need for training. Colleges are just beginning to take note. This year, Purdue University's School of Veterinary Medicine began offering a forensic veterinary medicine course, believed to be the first of its kind in the country, said professor Janice Sojka. Sojka said she recognized a need for the course after noticing a recent explosion of interest in the field. "With 'CSI' and 'Law & Order,' people kind of know what's out there and what can be done and then there's a growing expectation that you'll do that for your animals," she said. "It's become a lot more respected." Despite the fact that Christian got DNA results, animal control officers refused to declare Lucky a dangerous dog. Lucky and his owners have since moved away. And even though her CSI-style pursuit of justice was expensive and frustrating, the stay-at-home mother of two has no regrets. "I felt like I needed to do it for my family," she said. "The two-legged and the four-legged." sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7745957.html Spring blockbusters jump from theater to game console blockbusters jump from theater to game console AM PDT AM PDT Why do video-game publishers bother with movie tie-ins? The cost of licensing an anticipated blockbuster (like, say, this summer's "Transformers") is expensive. Designers have to work within creative constraints imposed by the Hollywood studio, and then have to rush to crank out something playable by the time the movie's released. And usually no one - neither gamers nor moviegoers - is satisfied with the results. And yet, the combination of an appealing license and decent gameplay can lead to a blockbuster game. THQ sold more than 2.6 million copies of its engaging "Cars" title, making it the second best-selling game of the year (after "Madden NFL 07"). On the other hand, you have disasters like Electronic Arts' "Superman Returns," which was delayed nearly five months after the movie's release and flatlined at retail. The three franchises spun off here have all been made into games before. Earlier "Spider-Man" games have done well, but critics have been unimpressed by previous "Pirates" and "Shrek" efforts. Let's see where they stand in 2007. -"Pirates of the Caribbean: At World's End" (Disney, for the Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, $59.99; Wii, $49.99; PlayStation 2, $39.99): The latest "Pirates" game is kind of a mash-up of the last two films in the trilogy, following Capt. Jack Sparrow's quest to retrieve Davy Jones' heart. Actually, it's difficult to make out that plot if you haven't seen the films; then again, many "Pirates" viewers have left theaters confused. Most of the game consists of swordplay against redcoats, monsters or other pirates, but there's not much skill involved and the fights get monotonous. There are a few decent boss battles that are a bit more challenging, as well as some simple platform sequences and a diverting game of liar's dice. Jack is usually front and center, but sometimes you get to play as Elizabeth Swann or Will Turner. Alas, none of the film's stars showed up for voiceover work, but their digital likenesses are pretty good, especially on the Xbox 360. Two stars out of four. -"Shrek the Third" (Activision, for the Xbox 360, Wii, $49.99; PlayStation 2, $39.99): You won't hear the voices of Mike Myers or Eddie Murphy here, either, but the video-game versions of Shrek and Donkey are otherwise indistinguishable from their computer-generated big-screen counterparts. Perhaps the most interesting thing about this game is the way it tells the story of "Shrek the Third" through oddly amusing two-dimensional puppet shows. The actual gameplay is woefully slapdash, consisting mostly of Shrek running around and beating up various fairy-tale villains. At times you'll switch to a supporting character, like Fiona or Puss in Boots, but the action still involves plowing through waves of enemies. Occasional sequences where you need to jump around obstacles are marred by sloppy controls and bad camera angles. "Shrek the Third" also offers a handful of lackluster minigames, like frog-herding and shuffleboard. (Really.) Overall, it seems like a wasted opportunity - although its flaws probably won't stop it from becoming a best-seller. One-and-a-half stars. -"Spider-Man 3" (Activision, for the Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, $59.99; Wii, $49.99; PlayStation 2, $39.99): "Spider-Man 3" looks likely to be the box-office winner among this year's "part 3s," and it squeaks out a victory in the game department, too. Then again, developer Treyarch has created three previous Spidey games, so it's disappointing that this game isn't better. It's still a rush to swing around Manhattan's skyscrapers, and it's nice to have the freedom to choose which missions you want to take on. But there's almost too much going on; you'll spend way too much time fighting gangs that have nothing to do with the movie's story. Unfortunately, the fights are tedious - until you take on a boss like New Goblin or Kingpin, when the fights become long and tedious. While we're glad to have voiceovers from Tobey Maguire and Bruce Campbell, the graphics on the 360 and PS3 aren't as slick as we'd expected. And the PS2 and Wii versions (not developed by Treyarch) are even uglier. Two-and-a-half stars. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech aims to help spies with new technology The Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity will try to develop groundbreaking technology for the 16 spy agencies. Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference Legendary technology rivals Bill Gates and Steve Jobs made a rare joint appearance Wednesday and wasted no time making nice. Cosmonauts install protective panels on international space station Two Russian cosmonauts climbed out of the international space station Wednesday to install protective panels designed to shield the orbiting outpost from dangerous space debris. Developer halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages Apple debuts songs online free of copy restrictions Animal CSIs taking a bite out of crime blockbusters jump from theater to game console Photobucket to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies Google chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal Mock assembly lines work out glitches Nintendo Wii: All fun and games, until someone gets hurt Wondering what that song is? Just ask your phone Infrared burners offer more options for backyard cooks Plant a tree, jet to Cancun? Offset schemes not that simple College programming classes retooled with chirping, cookie boxes Sony develops film-thin display that bends in full color Researchers use Web registration tool to digitize books Microsoft unveils new 'Surface' computer, the coffee European Union probes Google over search privacy concerns Facebook opens site to other companies Gasoline price Web sites see huge increase in visitors Site puts 90 million U.S. War records online Free upgrade for PlayStation 3 enhances image quality of old games MySpace hands over info on sex offenders New service allows you to start your own cell company New Google feature shows daily list of hot topics House approves bill to combat criminal use of spyware sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764732.html Agency aims to help spies with new technology aims to help spies with new technology This photo shows a Micro Unmanned Aerial Vehicle Dragonfly, developed by CIA in the 1970s, this micro UAV was the first flight of an insect-sized vehicle. May 31, 2007 at 7:58 AM PDT May 31, 2007 at 7:59 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - Using a new laptop and a satellite link, FBI agents can find out within two minutes whether the fingerprint from a newly captured suspect overseas matches a terrorist database in Virginia. Intelligence officials are running documents in languages such as Arabic through a new computer program called "English Now." It converts the foreign characters into the Roman alphabet and makes words such as Baghdad, President Bush or Osama bin Laden jump out to spies who can't read Arabic. The language software and the fingerprint-recognition system are examples of new spy gear that the national intelligence director's office bought last year. They may seem like tools that should have been available years ago, but the government isn't noted for its ability to quickly develop new technology. A fledging center called IARPA is hoping to change that. The Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity will try to develop groundbreaking technology for the 16 spy agencies. One potential tool sounds like it comes from an episode of Star Trek: "cloaking" technology that can bend radar around an object to make it appear it's not there. Others include power sources shrunk using nanotechnology and quantum computers that can speed code-breaking, says IARPA acting director Steve Nixon. "The world has changed in dramatic ways with globalization of technology," Nixon said in an interview. "These are the things that might not get done otherwise." But not everyone is convinced this is the right way to make new spy tools. The House Intelligence Committee has questions about whether the government truly needs it. "Much of this research is already going on," said Rep. Heather Wilson, R-N.M., the top Republican on the House Intelligence Committee's panel on technical intelligence. She said IARPA raises questions about the role of new National Intelligence Director Mike McConnell, who was supposed to coordinate U.S. intelligence agencies - not get into their daily operations. "Is it to fund these things and pull them into the DNI's office and give itself its own turf and projects and pet rocks?" she asked. There is even resistance within the CIA itself, according to officials who spoke about the concerns privately. The agency gets money that is supposed to go for spy tools that can be shared across the government. CIA spokesman Paul Gimigliano denied any friction, saying the agency welcomes ideas that promote collaboration on new technology. In the last half-century, U.S. spy agencies have made technical breakthroughs large and small. In the 1970s, the CIA shared its lithium-iodine batteries with the medical field, which now uses them in pacemakers. Its scientists developed microdot cameras that can produce images so small that they can be hidden in the period of this sentence. They also built a life-size robotic dragonfly that could have been used for surveillance, if only it could have handled crosswinds. If IARPA can clear some crucial hurdles, including convincing its congressional skeptics, the new office will be modeled after a similar agency that develops gee-whiz toys for the Pentagon. The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency was created after the Russians launched Sputnik in 1957, driving home the U.S. competitive disadvantage in space. Since then, DARPA researchers have brought the United States much-heralded advances including stealth technology, global positioning systems and the Internet. But it also brought controversy. The agency's Total Information Awareness data-mining program was launched after the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks to use technology to find terrorists; critics saw it as a step toward Big Brother-style mass government surveillance. Congress eliminated the program's funding at DARPA in 2003, but portions were moved to secret accounts at other agencies. The new intelligence organization will be significantly smaller than DARPA, which has a $3 billion annual budget. It will be based at the University of Maryland and staffed with 56 intelligence professionals from the CIA and from McConnell's organization. Rather than funding IARPA in the House intelligence budget bill passed this month, lawmakers directed technology dollars to centers developing tools that can be shared across government, including offices within the CIA, National Security Agency and National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency. The measure included criticism of McConnell's office for failing to provide details on how IARPA will work and raised questions about whether it would harm existing research for spy tools. Nixon says IARPA won't have labs and electron microscopes, but will sponsor research at universities, national labs and other organizations. IARPA is thinking broadly, he said. It won't limit itself to hard sciences, but will also tackle social-science problems such as finding tools for language research or to help analysts measure cultural habits of another society. He also said the organization will work on privacy protection. NSA and other agencies want to be able to make better use of foreign intelligence information from overseas, which often contains information on U.S. citizens. Given the lack of oversight in intelligence agencies, "this is an area where the research community has to step gingerly," said Marc Rotenberg, executive director of the Washington-based Electronic Privacy Information Center. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764597.html Developer halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages May 31, 2007 at 7:49 AM PDT May 31, 2007 at 7:49 AM PDT BEIJING (AP) - A Chinese city has halted construction of a chemical plant after residents sent more than 1 million mobile phone text messages protesting possible pollution dangers, news reports said Thursday. The $1.4 billion facility being built by Tenglong Aromatic PX (Xiamen) Co. Ltd to produce the petrochemical paraxylene was planned for the booming southeastern port of Xiamen, the Xinhua News Agency and newspapers said. "The Xiamen city government has decided to suspend construction of the PX (paraxylene) plant in Haicang District," a deputy mayor, Ding Guoyan, was quoted as saying by Xinhua. "The city government has listened to the opinions expressed and has decided, after careful deliberation, that the project must be re-evaluated." Paraxylene is used in production of plastics, polyester and film. Short-term exposure to paraxylene can cause eye, nose or throat irritation in humans, according to the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Chronic exposure can affect the central nervous system and may cause death. The plant was due to be located 10 miles from the center of Xiamen, a center for Taiwanese and Hong Kong investment. The nearest homes were one mile away, according to news reports. Demand for chemicals such as paraxylene is soaring as China's export-driven manufacturing industries expand. The communist government, long indifferent to the environmental cost of China's economic boom, has become more sensitive to pollution complaints after accidents that polluted rivers, disrupting water supplies to major cities. Farmers in areas throughout the country have protested over pollution that has tainted water supplies and ruined farmland. Xiamen residents sent more than 1 million text messages protesting plans to build the plant, Xinhua said. The suspension of the Xiamen project coincides with government efforts to slow an investment boom in industries where supplies of factories and other assets exceed demand. Last week, a state news agency quoted officials who cited public concerns about radiation exposure in announcing the suspension of work on a futuristic magnetic-levitation train line in Shanghai that critics said was too expensive and impractical. Irving, Texas-based ExxonMobil Corp.; Saudi Aramco, the Saudi government oil company; and China's No. 2 oil company, China Petroleum & Chemical Co., better known as Sinopec, announced in March they were expanding a joint venture chemical plant in the southeastern city of Quanzhou to produce paraxylene and other chemicals. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7764662.html Cosmonauts install protective panels on international space station install protective panels on international space station May 31, 2007 at 7:53 AM PDT May 31, 2007 at 7:53 AM PDT CAPE CANAVERAL, Fla. (AP) - Two Russian cosmonauts climbed out of the international space station Wednesday to install protective panels designed to shield the orbiting outpost from dangerous space debris. Commander Fyodor Yurchikhin and flight engineer Oleg Kotov opened a hatch on the Russian side of the space station at 3:05 p.m. EDT. The spacewalk ended about 5½ hours later. "Hooray! We're back home!" one of the cosmonauts said after climbing back into the space station airlock. The only lament from the first-time spacewalkers came at the end, from a cosmonaut who complained about an ill-fitted glove on his spacesuit. Both men were tethered during the spacewalk to keep them from floating away. The station's third occupant, U.S. astronaut Sunita Williams, remained inside. Space debris includes objects such as discarded rocket parts, planetary dust and rocks. Scientists consider it the greatest threat to the space station, orbiting about 220 miles above Earth. Kotov rode at the end of a crane operated by Yurchikhin to reach the stack of aluminum panels about 60 feet from the hatch. The 17 protective panels, each about 2 feet by 3 feet and weighing about 20 pounds, were delivered to the station last December and left outside in a formation dubbed "the Christmas tree." The cosmonauts installed five of the panels on a Russian section of the space station, and the others were to be put in place during a spacewalk next week. Engineers on the ground are able to monitor by radar the largest pieces of space debris - objects larger than a softball - and adjust the station's position accordingly, so the shielding will protect against smaller objects. "The consequence of small particles is not so great," said Kirk Shireman, NASA's deputy program manager for the space station. "Then there are the midrange particles. Those are the ones we worry about." An independent safety task force in February said that there was a 9 percent risk that the space station, once completed in 2010, could be hit with space debris severe enough to cause the loss of the outpost or crew members. That risk estimate was reduced to 5 percent if protective panels were installed on Russian portions of the space station. Sections of the space station built by NASA and the Japanese and European space agencies were protected sufficiently against space debris, the task force said. The spacewalk started about 45 minutes late, but a bright moon allowed the cosmonauts to catch up by working through what normally would have been darkness after orbital sunsets. The space station circles the Earth every 90 minutes. Asked by Mission Control in Moscow how it felt in their spacesuits once they were outside, one of the cosmonauts joked: "Kind of cloudy, a bit rainy. We didn't take an umbrella with us." The cosmonauts also successfully rerouted a cable for a navigation antenna that will be used later in the year for the first flight of a new European cargo vehicle. Wednesday's spacewalk was the first of two scheduled a week apart. Yurchikhin and Kotov will perform another one next Wednesday with similar tasks, including depositing canisters containing biological experiments outside the station. Space shuttle Atlantis and its seven astronauts are scheduled to fly to the station early next month. NASA managers on Wednesday began a two-day meeting at the Kennedy Space Center to decide whether to go ahead with the planned June 8 launch. A final decision was expected Thursday for the launch, which previously was postponed from mid-March because of a hailstorm that damaged the insulating foam on the shuttle's external tank. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7745882.html Google chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal AM PDT AM PDT SEOUL, South Korea (AP) - Google Chairman Eric Schmidt said Wednesday that U.S. regulatory approval of his company's proposed acquisition of DoubleClick will not be hindered by concerns over privacy. "We're quite convinced that the proposed merger meets all of the appropriate U.S. laws and is ultimately very good for consumers and for advertisers and publishers," Schmidt said at a news conference. Google, the world's No. 1 Internet search engine company, announced its plan to buy New York-based DoubleClick Inc. last month in a $3.1 billion acquisition that privacy advocates have urged the Federal Trade Commission to investigate. DoubleClick helps its customers place and track online advertising, including search ads, which Google - more than its nearest search competitors Yahoo Inc. and Microsoft Corp. - has turned into an extremely lucrative business. Google confirmed Tuesday that the FTC is conducting an antitrust review of the deal. Typically, antitrust reviews focus on monopoly concerns. But there is precedent for them to address privacy issues, analysts say. Schmidt said that Google, when considering the acquisition, "looked very carefully" at privacy and other issues that would come under legal review "because we knew competitors would raise those issues, as indeed they have." Mountain View, California-based Google Inc. is "not concerned that the choice of the FTC brings in some new issue that we had not thought about," Schmidt said. Schmidt was in South Korea to participate in the Seoul Digital Forum 2007, a three-day gathering of technology and media industry leaders organized by South Korean TV network SBS. Schmidt predicted Google would clear all regulatory hurdles and complete the acquisition by the end of 2007. He reiterated that view Wednesday, saying, "we're hoping to close later this year." Several consumer advocacy groups, led by the Electronic Privacy Information Center, urged the FTC to investigate the privacy implications of the acquisition. The groups said in their April 20 complaint that the two companies, when combined, would have access to an unprecedented amount of data on consumers' Web usage and Internet search habits. Regarding other possible acquisitions, Schmidt said Google is "always open" to the idea. DoubleClick had been the target of a fierce bidding war between Google and Microsoft. The Redmond, Washington-based Microsoft earlier this month agreed to buy U.S.-based online advertising firm aQuantive Inc. and has reportedly been in discussions with Yahoo for a possible merger or takeover. Schmidt carefully steered clear of any comment on Microsoft when asked about the company's activities. "We are not very focused on our competitors and so I won't speculate on Microsoft's current or future M&A activities," he said. "We've found it better to stay focused on our mission, our advertisers, our partners and our global presence as we're doing today." sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7751087.html Apple debuts songs online free of copy restrictions debuts songs online free of copy restrictions PM PDT PM PDT SAN JOSE, Calif. (AP) - Apple Inc.'s iTunes Store started selling thousands of songs without copy protection Wednesday, marking the trendsetting company's latest coup and a model for what analysts say will likely become a pattern for online music sales. Launching initially with songs from music company EMI Group PLC, iTunes Plus features tracks that are free of digital rights management, or DRM, technology - copy-protection software that limits where songs or movies can be played and distributed. The unrestricted content means some songs purchased from iTunes will work for the first time directly on portable players other than Apple's iPod, including Microsoft Corp.'s Zune. The inaugural batch of iTunes Plus songs includes music from Coldplay, The Rolling Stones, Norah Jones, Frank Sinatra, Pink Floyd and more than a dozen of Paul McCartney's classic albums. The DRM-free tracks feature a higher sound quality and cost $1.29 apiece - 30 cents more than the usual 99-cent price of other, copy-protected songs at the market-leading online music store. If available, users can upgrade existing purchases to DRM-free versions for 30 cents a song or $3 for most albums, Apple said. London-based EMI, the world's third-largest music company by sales, and Cupertino-based Apple announced their partnership in April to deliver the industry's first major offering of DRM-free songs, sharing a vision of what both companies say their consumers want: flexibility and CD-audio quality. Other smaller online music vendors, such as eMusic.com, already offer songs without DRM, but the selections have been limited to mostly content from independent labels. Barney Wragg, the global head of digital music at EMI, said the iTunes Plus launch capped six months of work to convert most all of the company's digital catalog into a DRM-free format. "Our customers told us two things deterred them from buying digital," Wragg said. "They weren't 100 percent confident that the songs they'd purchase could play on their devices, and they wanted something closer to CD quality." Earlier this year, Apple CEO Steve Jobs called on the world's four major record companies to start selling songs online without copy-protection software. "We definitely think it's the right thing to do," Eddy Cue, Apple's vice president of iTunes, said Wednesday. "In this case, EMI's a leader and we think others will follow." In a statement Wednesday, Jobs reiterated that Apple expects that more than half of the 5 million songs on iTunes will feature a DRM-free version by the end of the year. In the meantime, Apple's iTunes Store will continue to offer songs in the same copy-protected format as today at 99 cents per download and encoded at 128 kilobits per second. The iTunes Plus versions are encoded at 256 kbps, which Apple says makes the audio quality on par with original recordings. Apple also will continue to encode its songs - including EMI's DRM-free content - in the AAC audio format, which could force some users to go through an extra step of converting tunes into a version that would be compatible with their players. Some gadgets don't support AAC, including SanDisk's newest Sansa Connect or Samsung Electronics Co.'s YP-K3, but industry analyst Susan Kevorkian of the IDC market research company expects support for AAC will widen following Apple's move this week. Amazon.com Inc., by comparison, said it plans to sell songs online later this year in the DRM-free MP3 format - the popular unrestricted audio standard that is supported by virtually every device, including Apple's best-selling iPod. The next generation of digital music will be untethered from usage restrictions, Kevorkian predicts. It's something major music labels - other than just EMI - will have to do if they want to combat the industry's years long decline of music CD sales, she said. "They absolutely have to reach the Internet to drive music sales, and part of that is to remove the hurdle that comes with the lack of interoperability," Kevorkian said. Other major music labels - Sony BMG Music Entertainment, Universal Music Group and Warner Music - have all experimented with limited amounts of unprotected content online but have yet to make as aggressive a move as EMI. Representatives of Warner and Sony BMG declined to comment Wednesday about the iTunes Plus offering or their own plans around DRM technology. Universal did not return a call for comment. Michael Gartenberg, an analyst at JupiterResearch, said any worries the music companies have over increased piracy from DRM-free downloads are overblown. "CDs are all sold without copy protection already, so these (unrestricted) digital files are not going to change the piracy story," he said. "People who aren't going to pay for things aren't going to pay for things, and DRM just adds an unnecessary layer of complexity here for people who do embrace this medium and have already bought billions of songs on iTunes." Shares of Apple closed at $118.77, up $4.42, or nearly 4 percent, and gained another 65 cents in extended trading. In a separate announcement after the stock market closed, Apple said it will soon introduce direct access to YouTube videos from its Apple TV set-top-box device. It also announced a beefier, 160-gigabyte Apple TV model that will be available starting Thursday for $399. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7744297.html PDT PM PDT SEATTLE (AP) - Microsoft Corp. has taken the wraps off "Surface," a coffee-table shaped computer that responds to touch and to special bar codes attached to everyday objects. The machines, which Microsoft planned to debut Wednesday at a technology conference in Carlsbad, Calif., are set to arrive in November in T-Mobile USA stores and properties owned by Starwood Hotels & Resorts Worldwide Inc. and Harrah's Entertainment Inc. Surface is essentially a Windows Vista PC tucked inside a shiny black table base, topped with a 30-inch touchscreen in a clear acrylic frame. Five cameras that can sense nearby objects are mounted beneath the screen. Users can interact with the machine by touching or dragging their fingertips and objects such as paintbrushes across the screen, or by setting real-world items tagged with special bar-code labels on top of it. Unlike most touchscreens, Surface can respond to more than one touch at a time. During a demonstration with a reporter last week, Mark Bolger, the Surface Computing group's marketing director, "dipped" his finger in an on-screen paint palette, then dragged it across the screen to draw a smiley face. Then he used all 10 fingers at once to give the face a full head of hair. With a price tag between $5,000 and $10,000 per unit, Microsoft isn't immediately aiming for the finger painting set. (The company said it expects prices to drop enough to make consumer versions feasible in three to five years.) Some of the first Surface models are planned to help customers pick out new cell phones at T-Mobile stores. When customers plop a phone down on the screen, Surface will read its bar code and display information about the handset. Customers can also select calling plans and ringtones by dragging icons toward the phone. Guests sitting in some Starwood Hotel lobbies will be able to cluster around the Surface to play music, then buy songs using a credit card or rewards card tagged with a bar code. In some hotel restaurants, customers will be able to order food and drinks, then split the bill by setting down a card or a room key and dragging their menu items "onto" the card. At Harrah's locations, visitors will be able to learn about nearby Harrah's venues on an interactive map, then book show tickets or make dinner reservations. Microsoft is working on a limited number of programs to ship with Surface, including one for sharing digital photographs. Bolger placed a card with a bar code onto Surface's surface; digital photographs appeared to spill out of the card into piles on the screen. Several people gathered around the table pulled photos across the screen using their fingertips, rotated them in circles and even dragged out the corners to enlarge the images - behavior made possible by the advanced graphics support deep inside Windows Vista. "It's not a touch screen, it's a grab screen," Bolger said. Historically, Microsoft has focused on creating new software, giving computer programmers tools to build applications on its platforms, and left hardware manufacturing to others. (Some recent exceptions include the Xbox 360 and the Zune music player, made by the same Microsoft division that developed Surface.) For now, Microsoft is making the Surface hardware itself, and has only given six outside software development firms the tools they need to make Surface applications. Matt Rosoff, an analyst at the independent research group Directions on Microsoft, said in an interview that keeping the technology's inner workings under wraps will limit what early customers - the businesses Microsoft is targeting first with the machine - will be able to do with it. But overall, analysts who cover the PC industry were wowed by Surface. Surface is "important for Microsoft as a promising new business, as well as demonstrating very concretely to the market that Microsoft still knows how to innovate, and innovate in a big way," said Michael Gartenberg, an analyst at Jupiter Research. sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7816312.html Apple iPhone to launch June 29 iPhone to launch June 29 Jun 3, 2007 at 6:44 PM PDT Jun 4, 2007 at 7:56 AM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - Apple Inc.'s highly anticipated iPhone will be available June 29, according to both TV commercials broadcast Sunday night and a company spokesman. The combination cell phone, media player and wireless Web-surfing device will retail for $499 and $599, depending on configuration. It will be offered exclusively by AT&T Inc.'s wireless division, formerly known as Cingular. The iPhone, which sports no keypad but instead a touch-sensitive screen, was unveiled with great fanfare in early January by Apple CEO Steve Jobs. He said it would appear in stores in June but gave no specific date. Sunday night's ads showed off several of the gadget's features and ended with the pronouncement that the phone will be available "Only on the new AT&T" and "Coming June 29." One aired on the CW network before a 7 p.m. broadcast of "7th Heaven." Tom Neumayr, an Apple spokesman, confirmed the June 29 sale date. An AT&T spokespeople did not immediately return a phone call. In recent months, the company's stock has been served by speculation and excitement over the iPhone. Shares of Apple's stock rose May 25 after a media report said that the iPhone would go on sale June 20. Neither AT&T nor Apple would confirm or deny that date at the time. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Man, woman dead in Kent murder-suicide
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech iPhone to launch June 29 Apple Inc.'s highly anticipated iPhone will be available June 29, according to both TV commercials broadcast Sunday night and a company spokesman. U.S. cutting back efforts to monitor global warming from space As President Bush heads to a summit of industrial nations in Germany with a new initiative to reduce the greenhouse gases blamed for climate change, his administration is cutting back on efforts to measure the impact of the warming trend. Rogue breeders hiding on Internet Animal welfare advocates say the Internet has become the latest vehicle for large-scale dog breeding operations - or "puppy mills" - to sell their wares. Google buys feed distributor FeedBurner Ex-Senate aide, sex blogger files for bankruptcy Google's new maps include unwitting subjects Arrest of Seattle 'Spam King' makes little difference NASA managers agree to launch space shuttle next week EMI Music licenses video and music content for use on YouTube Feds give web access to lobbying records Budget cuts threaten world's largest radio telescope Agency aims to help spies with new technology Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance at technology conference Cosmonauts install protective panels on international space station Developer halts construction after receiving 1 million protest text messages Apple debuts songs online free of copy restrictions Animal CSIs taking a bite out of crime Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Spring blockbusters jump from theater to game console Photobucket to become part of MySpace as parent buys 2 companies Google chairman dismisses privacy issue over proposed DoubleClick deal Mock assembly lines work out glitches Nintendo Wii: All fun and games, until someone gets hurt Wondering what that song is? Just ask your phone Infrared burners offer more options for backyard cooks Plant a tree, jet to Cancun? Offset schemes not that simple College programming classes retooled with chirping, cookie boxes Sony develops film-thin display that bends in full color arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7824352.html U.S. cutting back efforts to monitor global warming from space cutting back efforts to monitor global warming from space Jun 4, 2007 at 8:44 AM PDT Jun 4, 2007 at 8:44 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - U.S. scientists will soon lose much of their ability in space to monitor for global warming, a confidential report to the White House warns. As President Bush heads to a summit of industrial nations in Germany with a new initiative to reduce the greenhouse gases blamed for climate change, his administration is cutting back on efforts to measure the impact of the warming trend. The problem is a costly and problem-plagued satellite system. Because of technology glitches and a near-doubling of its original $6.5 billion cost, the Defense Department has decided to downsize and launch four satellites paired into two orbits, instead of six satellites and three orbits. The satellites were intended to gather weather and climate data and replace existing satellites as they come to the end of their useful lifetimes, beginning in 2010. The reduced system of four satellites will now focus on weather forecasting. Most of the climate instruments needed to collect more precise data over long periods are being eliminated. Instead, the Pentagon and its two partners - the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and NASA - will rely on European satellites for most of the climate data. U.S. scientists worry they won't provide the data needed. "Unfortunately, the recent loss of climate sensors ... places the overall climate program in serious jeopardy," NOAA and NASA scientists told the White House in a confidential Dec. 11 report obtained by The Associated Press. They said they will face major gaps in data collectible only from satellites about ice caps and sheets, surface levels of seas and lakes, sizes of glaciers, surface radiation, water vapor, snow cover and even atmospheric carbon dioxide. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7790786.html Google's new maps include unwitting subjects new maps include unwitting subjects Jun 1, 2007 at 1:23 PM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 4:29 PM PDT SAN FRANCISCO (AP) - Google Inc. bills the latest twist on its online maps as "Street View," but it looks a bit like "Candid Camera" as you cruise through the panorama of pictures that captured fleeting moments in neighborhoods scattered across the country. In San Francisco, there's a man picking his nose on a street corner, another fellow taking out the trash and another guy scaling the outside of an apartment building, perhaps just for fun or maybe for some more sinister purpose. Further down the highway at Stanford University, there's the titillation of a couple coeds sunbathing in their bikinis. In San Jose, there's the rather sad sight of a bearded man apparently sleeping - or did he just pass out? - in the shadow of a garbage can, with what appears to be an empty cup perched in front of him. In Miami, there's a group of protesters carrying signs outside an abortion clinic. In other cities, you can see men entering adult book stores or leaving strip joints. Potentially embarrassing or compromising scenes like these are raising questions about whether the Internet's leading search engine has gone too far in its latest attempt to make the world a more accessible - and transparent - place. "Everyone expects a certain level of anonymity as they move about their daily lives," said Kevin Bankston, a staff attorney for the Electronic Frontier Foundation, a group devoted to protecting people's rights on the Internet. "There is a certain 'ick' factor here." Google is hoping to elicit "oohs and ahhs" with Street View, which was introduced on its maps for the San Francisco Bay area, New York, Las Vegas, Denver and Miami earlier this week. The Mountain View-based company already is planning to expand the service to other U.S. cities and other countries. The feature provides high-resolution photos to enable street-level tours so users can get a more realistic, 360-degree look at places they might go or spots where they already have been. To guard against privacy intrusions, Google said all the photos were taken from vehicles driving along public streets during the past year. The photos will be periodically updated, but the company hasn't specified a timetable for doing so. "This imagery is no different from what any person can readily capture or see walking down the street," Google spokeswoman Megan Quinn said in a statement. "Imagery of this kind is available in a wide variety of formats for cities all around the world." Google certainly isn't the first company to venture down this photographic avenue. Amazon.com Inc. launched a similar mapping feature in January 2005 on a search engine called A9.com. That search engine's former chief executive, Udi Manber, now works for Google. And Microsoft Corp. began displaying street-level pictures on its online maps for San Francisco and Seattle late last year. A9's photographic maps, which were abandoned late last year, raised privacy concerns about women being seen entering domestic violence shelters. Hoping to avoid similar complaints, Google tried to identify potentially sensitive locations by contacting the Safety Net Project at the National Network to End Domestic Violence, much to the delight of Cindy Southworth, the group's director. "We were thrilled that a major technology company like this reached out in this way to help protect these victims," she said. Google also is offering a "help" button on all the street-level photos to provide a link for users to request the removal of an image that is objectionable or clearly identifies a person who doesn't want to be included in the visual tapestry. Company spokeswoman Victoria Grand said Google has fielded "very few" removal requests so far. Eileen Diamond is hoping she can persuade Google to replace its current picture of a Miami street corner where protesters gather once a week to protest the abortions performed at A Choice For Women. The picture, still available on Google's maps Friday afternoon, includes a cluster of protesters standing outside the clinic, an image that clinic administrator Diamond worries will scare away potential patients or perhaps attract trouble makers to the facility. "It's sort of disturbing because it's certainly not the kind of message we want to be sending out," said Diamond. "It's already very painful for our patients to come in. We want them to feel safe and protected." As of Friday, Diamond said she was still having trouble finding the right way through Google's Web site to notify the company she would like the picture removed. Privacy experts believe these kinds of ticklish situations are bound to arise as technology makes it increasingly easy to share pictures and video on the Internet, pitting the rights of free expression against the rights to personal privacy. "What you have to do is balance out the perception against the reality and I think in this case, the perception is much scarier than the reality," said Lauren Weinstein, co-founder of People For Internet Responsibility, a policy group. Because Google's street-level pictures were taken in public places, the company appears to be on solid legal ground, according to both Bankston and Weinstein. But Bankston doesn't think the law necessarily absolves Google, particularly since the company has embraced "Don't Be Evil" as its creed. He worries that some people in need of psychological or medical help won't seek treatment for fear of being caught in the cross-hairs of Google's cameras. "There's a distinction between what Google has a legal right to do and what is the responsible thing to do," said Bankston, who believes the company should have blurred the images of unwitting pedestrians before it posted the street-level pictures. "It's a problem we as a society have to grapple with, and I think we are just now seeing the fault lines emerge." While he thinks some of the issues raised by Google's new service are prime fodder for a healthy debate, Weinstein worries that it might inspire overly repressive laws. "It's a tough area, but it just seems there is no way around the fact that public spaces are public spaces," Weinstein said. "You don't want to create an environment where it becomes illegal to take photos in public. It can be riskier not to be able to see something than it is to be able to see something." Wired gallery of odd scenes from Google's Street View: arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7814097.html Rogue breeders hiding on Internet breeders hiding on Internet Jun 3, 2007 at 2:10 PM PDT Jun 3, 2007 at 2:19 PM PDT OMAHA, Neb. (AP) - Type "Yorkies for sale" into an Internet search engine, and hundreds of Web sites come up. Animal welfare advocates say the Internet has become the latest vehicle for large-scale dog breeding operations - or "puppy mills" - to sell their wares. The concern is that people who sell dogs over the Internet are able to skirt federal licensing and inspections because they are not considered wholesalers. And because most states don't have puppy lemon laws, an Internet buyer often has no recourse if his or her new dog has health problems. "People are getting suckered," said veterinarian Helen Hamilton of Fremont, Calif. Hamilton said some of her clients have been victimized by Internet dog sales. Many of the puppies are diseased because of dismal kennel conditions, or have genetic defects because of inbreeding and other poor breeding practices, she said. Hamilton led an effort in April to rescue suspected puppy mill dogs at an auction in Arkansas. She and her group raised $12,000 to buy 71 dogs, mostly older females that were used for breeding. The dogs were placed in shelters in California, Georgia and Florida. Clem Disterhaupt, president of the Nebraska Dog Breeders Association, said he sells some of his soft-coated Wheaten terrier puppies over the Internet, but provides every buyer a written guarantee that allows the dog to be returned if defects are found. There is no puppy lemon law in Nebraska, but Disterhaupt, of Stuart, Neb., said he is helping craft legislation that could be introduced in the Legislature next year. Disterhaupt acknowledged that some Internet sellers are not reputable, but said if a buyer does his or her homework, the Internet can be a good way to find a pet. Disterhaupt said he provides prospective buyers with pictures of his dogs and the names of people who have bought puppies from him. He said that in many cases, a potential buyer lives within driving distance of one of his references. "They can go see the dogs, and then they know they're buying from someone reputable," he said. Stephanie Shain, outreach director for the Humane Society of the United States, said buyers should do more than view photos provided by the breeder. "You have to absolutely go and see the operation," she said. "It's sad but true. You can't trust the pictures they send you in an e-mail. You need to see the conditions the puppies are born into." Animal welfare advocates encourage buyers to meet the parents of their prospective puppy. That not only allows the buyer to see the breeders' kennel conditions, but it also gives an indication of the puppy's temperament. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7787691.html NASA managers agree to launch space shuttle next week managers agree to launch space shuttle next week Jun 1, 2007 at 10:14 AM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 10:14 AM PDT CAPE CANAVERAL, Fla. (AP) - NASA managers announced Thursday that they would press ahead with the first space shuttle launch of the year next week, three months later than originally planned because of a hail storm that pockmarked the spacecraft's external tank. After a two-day meeting at the Kennedy Space Center, NASA officials agreed to launch Atlantis at 7:38 p.m. EDT June 8 on a mission to deliver a new pair of solar arrays to the international space station. "The team is really pumped to get this done this time," said Mike Leinbach, NASA launch director. "We've been doing three months of down time due to the hail storm." The launch had been set for mid-March, but the storm dropped golf-ball sized hail on the launch pad and damaged insulating foam on the external tank. NASA managers are especially cautious when it comes to the external tank since a piece of foam fell off Columbia's tank in 2003 and hit the spacecraft's wing. Damage from the impact allowed fiery gases to penetrate Columbia during descent, killing all seven astronauts aboard. After the hail storm, Atlantis was rolled back to the Vehicle Assembly Building, where technicians painstakingly repaired thousands of gashes in the tank's foam. "We are extremely confident that we have done perfectly good repairs and have a tank that is safe to fly," said space shuttle program manager Wayne Hale. Engineers have put the probability of foam coming off a failed repair area and causing critical damage to the shuttle at 1 in 650, Hale said, but "probability numbers I would take with a good grain of salt." "All of that is good as a management tool," he said. "But I wouldn't take any of those numbers to the bank as a real indication of where you would put your money on the roulette wheel in Las Vegas." Although a final polling of managers was unanimous to go ahead with a launch attempt, managers initially argued over whether bolt parts that hold in place pumps in the shuttle's main engines should be replaced because there was evidence that they could corrode with age. They eventually concluded that the pumps on Atlantis weren't old enough to have that problem and that an inspection of Atlantis' pumps had turned up nothing. The postponement of Atlantis' launch forced NASA to cut the expected number of shuttle flights this year from five to four and pushed back the flight schedule for the rest of the year. Astronaut Clayton Anderson was added to the previously six-person Atlantis crew so he can replace U.S. astronaut Sunita Williams on the space station. Otherwise, Williams would have spent eight months at the station, instead of the more typical six months. Her original return trip to Earth aboard shuttle Endeavour was pushed back from early July to late August. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7787731.html Arrest of Seattle 'Spam King' makes little difference of Seattle 'Spam King' makes little difference Jun 1, 2007 at 10:16 AM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 10:16 AM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - Junk e-mail continued to land in mailboxes around the world Thursday, despite the arrest a day earlier of a man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers. Even if Robert Alan Soloway is ultimately convicted and his operations shuttered, spam experts say dozens are in line to fill the void. "In the short term, the effect it's going to have is more symbolic more than anything else," said John Levine, co-author of "Fighting Spam for Dummies." "Soloway is a large spammer, but hardly the only large spammer." Levine said Soloway was a good target because he operates in the United States and has taken few steps to cover his tracks. Soloway, 27, was once on a top 10 list of spammers kept by The Spamhaus Project, an international anti-spam organization. Others have since topped him, mostly based in Russia and other countries out of reach of U.S. or European law. But Soloway remains on a Spamhaus list of about 135 spammers deemed responsible for as much as 80 percent of all junk e-mail, and one Spamhaus official considers him in the top 20. "Most of the Russian gangs seem to have a lot more freshly hijacked computers and are able to deliver much more spam into people's inboxes," said Vincent Hanna, a European investigator for Spamhaus. "The stuff that Robert Soloway had under this control, let's call it `second grade."' Soloway was arrested Wednesday on charges of mail fraud, wire fraud, e-mail fraud, aggravated identity theft and money laundering. Prosecutors say Soloway has sent millions of junk e-mails since 2003 and continued even after Microsoft Corp. won a $7 million civil judgment against him in 2005 and the operator of a small Internet service provider in Oklahoma won a $10 million judgment. Soloway could face decades in prison, though prosecutors said they have not calculated what sentence range he might face. Like most spammers these days, authorities say, Soloway sent out unsolicited bulk e-mails using networks of compromised computers called "zombies." These are generally home computers whose owners typically have no idea that their machines have been infected with viruses or other malicious programs; service providers can't easily block messages from zombies because they are mixed in with legitimate messages. What set Soloway apart was his focus on spam designed to sell tools and services for companies and organizations to send their own junk e-mail, said Patrick Peterson, vice president of technology at anti-spam vendor IronPort Systems Inc. Other types of spam were largely unaffected by the arrest. One Gmail account collected messages Thursday promising deals on Viagra and other medicines, while an AOL account drew an offer for two large, mouthwatering pizzas. IronPort said it saw no notable drop in spam volume, with 70 billion messages in a 24-hour period, unchanged from two weeks earlier. The company said spam has doubled from about 36 billion a day last May. Anne Mitchell, who runs the anti-spam consultancy Institute for Spam and Internet Public Policy, said an individual user who happens to be on Soloway's list might see a big drop, but the collective impact is negligible. "It's not that different from the mafia," she said. "Many times the feds grab a high-ranking don but the mafia didn't go away. Someone's going to step up and fill his void." Nonetheless, anti-spam experts lauded the arrest, calling it an encouraging sign that authorities are taking spam seriously. Compared with civil lawsuits that have led to multimillion dollar judgments, prosecutions have been rare. "Criminal prosecutions are absolutely necessary," said Richi Jennings, lead analyst for e-mail security with Ferris Research. "It adds a whole new level of fear to the lives of these spammers." Joseph Smith, 43, a Web designer in Greensboro, N.C., said he couldn't say for sure the arrest resulted in a decrease in spam Thursday, but he was hopeful. "I can see the Net becoming a little more secure now and becoming a more enjoyable experience," he said. Microsoft spokesman Lou Gellos said the arrest not only removes Soloway from spamming "but it throws caution to others that are doing it as well. There's hope that this causes a ripple, if not a wave." At Wednesday's news conference in Seattle announcing the arrest, U.S. Attorney Jeff Sullivan acknowledged that "others sometimes take their place, but we want it to be a deterrent." arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7787641.html EMI Music licenses video and music content for use on YouTube Music licenses video and music content for use on YouTube Jun 1, 2007 at 10:11 AM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 10:11 AM PDT LOS ANGELES (AP) - EMI Music, home to recording artists such as Coldplay, Norah Jones and Keith Urban, has reached an agreement with Google Inc.'s YouTube that lets the Web site carry music videos and other content from EMI artists and clears the way for users to post videos with select EMI content, the companies said Thursday. With the deal, San Bruno-based YouTube now has permission to host videos from all four of the world's major recording companies. YouTube reached agreements with the other music labels in October, but Britain-based EMI had been the lone holdout. Financial terms of the deal were not disclosed. EMI Music, a unit of EMI Group PLC, will receive a cut of revenue from ads shown on YouTube when EMI content is being viewed, said Chris Maxcy, head of business development for YouTube. "Through this agreement EMI Music and its artists will be fairly compensated for their work," EMI Chief Executive Eric Nicoli said in a statement. Previous deals struck by the company with other record labels and TV networks have also included ad revenue-sharing. Under the terms of the agreement, EMI will make its artists' music videos available on the site. Computer users will also be allowed to use content from select EMI artists in videos they create and post on the site. Like other record labels, EMI will be able to identify when its video or audio material is being used in user-generated videos on the Web site and have it removed, should it opt to do so. "There will be cases where maybe a particular artist doesn't want to participate and the labels need to respect that," Maxcy said. "In those cases, that content will be removed." Video and songs by The Beatles, for example, will not be available on YouTube, EMI said. YouTube has quietly rolled out technology that uses word search and other filtering systems to track content on the site. The company is also exploring other methods, including audio and video fingerprinting, Maxcy said. Google shares rose 69 cents to $497.91 Thursday. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7807652.html Google buys feed distributor FeedBurner buys feed distributor FeedBurner Jun 2, 2007 at 6:18 PM PDT Jun 2, 2007 at 6:18 PM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - Online search leader Google Inc. said Friday it purchased FeedBurner, which helps bloggers and podcasters syndicate and make money from their online content, for an undisclosed sum. Chicago-based FeedBurner ''delivers feeds to millions of users around the world and offers unique and useful tools for publishers to analyze, optimize, and monetize their content,'' wrote Susan Wojcicki, Google's vice president of product management, in announcing the deal on Google's official blog. FeedBurner also offers a tool for pushing ads through feeds, generating advertising revenue. Shares of Mountain View, Calif.-based Google rose $2.49 to $500.40 Friday. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7805952.html Ex-Senate aide, sex blogger files for bankruptcy aide, sex blogger files for bankruptcy Jun 2, 2007 at 12:31 PM PDT Jun 2, 2007 at 1:18 PM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - Jessica Cutler, the former Senate aide whose online sex diary landed her a book deal and a Playboy photo spread but got her kicked off Capitol Hill, has filed for bankruptcy. Cutler, a former aide to then-Sen. Mike DeWine, R-Ohio, created the ''Washingtonienne'' blog in 2004 and began posting racy details about her sex life with six men, including a Senate colleague and ''a few generous older gentlemen'' who she said paid many of her living expenses. When the blog was discovered, Cutler was fired. She moved to New York, wrote a novel based on the scandal, posed naked and started a new Web site that describes herself as ''a published author who jumps out of cakes for money.'' Under the occupation heading of her Web site, it reads: ''I'm freelancing.'' Cutler has spent much of her time fending off a lawsuit by ex-boyfriend and fellow DeWine staffer Robert Steinbuch, who claims Cutler's blog publicly humiliated him. He is seeking more than $20 million in damages. In court documents filed in the case Thursday, however, Cutler says she can't even pay her American Express bill, legal fees and student loans. She submitted to the judge a copy of a Chapter 7 bankruptcy petition filed in New York dated Wednesday. The lawsuit is being closely watched by online privacy groups and bloggers because the case could help establish whether people who keep online diaries are obligated to protect the privacy of the people they interact with offline. Cutler's bankruptcy filing further clouds the fate of a lawsuit already mired in contentious pretrial arguments. A federal judge has encouraged both sides to cooperate and perhaps even settle the case, but both sides are demanding personal information from the other and Steinbuch says he doesn't want to give a videotaped deposition for fear Cutler will put it in on the Internet. Messages seeking comment were left at the office of Steinbuch's attorney and on Cutler's cell phone. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/tech/7787616.html Feds give web access to lobbying records give web access to lobbying records Jun 1, 2007 at 10:10 AM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 10:10 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - The Justice Department has launched a searchable online database that tracks the activities of foreign governments and companies lobbying the U.S. government. Previously, people seeking this information had to phone the Justice Department or visit its office in person to get public disclosure documents, which representatives of foreign entities are required to provide under the Foreign Agents Registration Act, or FARA. Passed in 1938, FARA requires all individuals acting as agents of foreign entities in a political or quasi-political capacity to disclose their relationship, activities, receipts and payments supporting the activities. Under a federal law enacted in 1995, Congress also requires lobbyists working for American companies, associations and other entities to disclose activities that could influence members of the executive and legislative branches. Those public documents are available online through a Senate Web site. The new Justice Department site, fara.com, also provides links to lobbying statutes, semiannual reports to Congress and access to registration forms for filing purposes. "This Web site is a significant step in the effort to ensure transparency in the world of foreign-influenced lobbying," Kenneth L. Wainstein, assistant attorney general for national security, said in a statement. The agency said some documents are still unavailable online due to potential privacy issues. However, they can still be accessed at the FARA public office. arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
